Hawaii statutes.
§834-3 Cooperation by agencies. All
courts, departments, agencies, officers, and employees of this State and its
political subdivisions are hereby directed to enforce the Agreement on
Detainers and to cooperate with one another and with other party states in
enforcing the agreement and effectuating its purpose. [L 1965, c 160, §3; Supp,
§250A-3; HRS §714-3; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next